Louisiana, session 2026, HB306.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:2136.1(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2136.1. Costs paid by abuser
A. Except as provided in Subsection B of this Section, all court costs,
attorney fees a reasonable attorney fee, costs of enforcement and modification
proceedings, costs of appeal, court approved evaluation fees, and expert witness fees
incurred in maintaining or defending any proceeding concerning domestic abuse
assistance in accordance with the provisions of this Part shall be paid by the
perpetrator of the domestic violence, including all costs of medical and
psychological care for the abused adult, or for any of the children, necessitated by
the domestic violence.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-864 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 306